Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 4. Information.

Sec. 17.30.150.
Reliance on Drug Enforcement Administration.

Results, information, and evidence received from the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of Justice relating to the enforcement functions of this chapter, including results of inspections conducted by it, may be relied on and acted on by the Department of Public Safety in the exercise of its enforcement functions under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 20 ch 146 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

As enacted, this section contained a subsection (b), but the provisions of that subsection were renumbered as AS

17.30.155

.

Sec. 17.30.155.
Confidentiality of certain information.

A practitioner engaged in medical practice or research may not disclose the name or identity of a patient or research subject that the practitioner is required to keep confidential unless ordered by a court to disclose it within the context of a criminal investigation or proceeding.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 21 ch 146 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.30.150(b). Renumbered in 1982.